Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
General Provisions

§ 77-7-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Mississippi Motor Carrier Regulatory Law of 1938.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7632; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-3.
Declaration of public policy; application of chapter.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the legislature to regulate motor carriers in the public interest to the end that the safety and welfare of the public in its use of the highways and of the transportation agencies by motor vehicle used thereon may be practiced; that the property of the state in its highways may be protected from unreasonable, improper and excessive use; that the inherent advantages of highway transportation may be recognized and preserved; that sound economic conditions in such transportation and among such carriers may be fostered; that the service by motor carriers may be adequate, economical, and efficient; that reasonable charges may be made therefor, without unjust discriminations, undue preferences or advantages, and unfair or destructive competitive practices; that relations between motor carriers and other carriers may be improved and coordinated; and that cooperation may be maintained with the governments of the United States and the several states, and with their duly authorized officials in carrying out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. This chapter shall apply to persons and motor vehicles engaged in interstate commerce to the extent permitted by the Constitution and laws of the United States and as provided herein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7633; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-5.
Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any person from the payment of any licenses, fees, taxes or levies now or hereafter imposed by law.

Nothing in this chapter shall apply to transportation network companies or transportation network company drivers as defined in Section 77-8-1 or any activity regulated in Chapter 8, Title 77.

Neither this chapter nor any provision thereof shall apply or be construed to apply to commerce with foreign nations, or commerce among the several states of the union, except insofar as the same may be permitted under the provisions of the Constitution of the United States and the Acts of Congress.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7686; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 2016, ch. 328, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-7-7.
Definitions.

Whenever used in this chapter unless expressly stated otherwise:

The term “person” means individual, firm, copartnership, corporation, company, association or joint-stock association, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or personal representative thereof.

The term “commission” means the Mississippi Transportation Commission.

The term “highway” means every public highway or place of whatever nature open to the use of the public for purposes of vehicle travel in this state, including the streets and alleys in towns and cities.

The term “motor vehicle” and “vehicle” means any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer or semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power and used upon the highways in the transportation of passengers or property; such term, however, does not include any vehicle, locomotive or car operated exclusively on a rail or rails.

The term “common carrier by motor vehicle” means any person who or which undertakes, whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, to transport passengers or household goods.

The term “contract carrier by motor vehicle” means any person, not included under subsection (e) of this section, who or which, under special and individual contracts or agreements, and whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, transports passengers or household goods.

The term “restricted motor carrier” means all carriers of property, except household goods, by motor vehicle for compensation.

The “services” and “transportation” to which this chapter applies include all vehicles operated by, for or in the interest of any motor carrier irrespective of ownership or contract, express or implied, together with all facilities and property operated or controlled by any such carrier or carriers and used in the transportation of passengers or property or in the performance of any service in connection therewith.

The term “certificate” means a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the commission to common carriers by motor vehicle and restricted common carriers by motor vehicle under this chapter.

The term “permit” means a permit issued by the commission to contract carriers by motor vehicle under this chapter.

The term “interstate permit” means a permit issued under the terms of this chapter to the holder of a certificate of public convenience and necessity, a permit, or other operating authority from the U.S. Department of Transportation.

The term “owner” or “operator” and “owner and operator” means any individual, firm, copartnership, corporation, company, association or joint-stock association, and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or personal representative thereof, to whom or to which a certificate of convenience and necessity or permit or interstate permit has been issued by the commission.

The term “vanpooling” means a nonprofit arrangement entered into to provide for the transportation of persons to and from their places of employment utilizing a motor vehicle manufactured primarily for the transporting of not less than eight (8) nor more than fifteen (15) people, and where the costs of operating said vehicle, including reasonable vehicle depreciation costs, are paid for by those people utilizing such arrangement.

The term “gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR)” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single motor vehicle.

The term “gross combination weight rating (GCWR)” means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a combination (articulated) motor vehicle. In the absence of a value specified by the manufacturer, GCWR will be determined by adding the GVWR of the power unit and the total weight of the towed unit and any load thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7634, 7677-05; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1948, ch. 327, § 14; Laws, 1980, ch. 343, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007; Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-9.
Qualifications upon definition of “common carrier by motor vehicle” and “contract carrier by motor vehicle.”

The term “common carrier by motor vehicle,” as defined in subsection (e) of Section 77-7-7, and the term “contract carrier by motor vehicle,” as defined in subsection (f) of Section 77-7-7, shall not include:

Motor vehicles employed to transport school children and teachers; motor vehicles transporting people where not more than seven (7) passengers are carried; motor vehicles used for transporting workers to and from any factory, railroad shop, mill or agricultural enterprise located in this state; and motor vehicles used in vanpooling as the term is defined in subsection (m) of Section 77-7-7.

Trolley buses operated by electric power derived from fixed overhead wire, furnishing local passenger transportation similar to street railway service.

Motor vehicles engaged exclusively in hauling for the Mississippi Department of Transportation, or for any county, city or town in this state.

Motor vehicles engaged in the transportation of passengers and household goods wholly within a municipality, except when the transportation is under a common control, management or arrangement for a continuous carriage or shipment to or from a point without the municipality, municipalities or zone.

Motor vehicles operated by a bona fide regularly licensed merchant, manufacturer or dealer in this state transporting merchandise or other commodities owned by the merchant, manufacturer or dealer in his or her own motor vehicle.

Buses. Motor vehicles owned or chartered by all schools and colleges, religious or charitable associations or institutions, or governmental agencies, when used to convey their athletic teams, orchestras, or other scholastic, religious or charitable organizations or employees on temporary trips through or in this state, and motor vehicles transporting students on guided tours through or in this state. This exemption shall not be construed to apply to motor vehicles or buses transporting persons that operate on a fixed schedule through this state for compensation or for hire.

Any person, who by lease or otherwise permits the use of a motor vehicle or vehicles by others, and who furnishes in connection therewith a driver or drivers, either directly or indirectly, or in any manner whatsoever exercises any control, or assumes any responsibility over the operation of the vehicle or vehicles, other than furnishing necessary maintenance during the period of the lease or other device, shall be deemed a “common carrier by motor vehicle,” or “contract carrier by motor vehicle” or “restricted motor carrier.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 7635, 7679; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1948, ch. 270, § 1; Laws, 1958, ch. 505, § 1; Laws, 1960, ch. 406, § 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995).

§ 77-7-11.
Obedience to chapter required.

No motor carrier shall operate any motor vehicle for the transportation of passengers or property for compensation on any highway in this state, except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, and every such motor carrier is hereby declared to be subject to control, supervision and regulation by the commission. Nothing in this chapter shall confer any proprietary or property rights in the use of the public highways.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7636; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-13.
Powers and duties of commission.

It shall be the duty of the commission and the commission shall have the power:

To regulate common carriers by motor vehicle and contract carriers by motor vehicle not exempted in this chapter, doing business in this state, and to that end, the commission may establish reasonable requirements with respect to continuous and adequate service, transportation of baggage and express, uniform system of accounts, records and reports, preservation of records, and safety of operation and equipment, including maximum hours of service of employees.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, to avail itself of the special information of the Mississippi Transportation Commission in promulgating safety requirements and in considering applications for certificates or permits with particular reference to conditions of the public highway or highways involved, and the ability of the said public highway or highways to carry added traffic; the Mississippi Transportation Commission upon request of the commission shall furnish such information.

To administer, execute and enforce all other provisions of this chapter, to make necessary orders in connection therewith, and to prescribe rules, regulations and procedure for such administration.

To inquire into the organization of motor carriers, and into the management of their businesses, to keep itself informed as to the manner and method in which the same is conducted, and to transmit to the Legislature, from time to time, such recommendations as to additional legislation relating to such carriers as the commission may deem necessary.

The commission may from time to time establish such just and reasonable classifications of groups of carriers included in the terms “common carrier by motor vehicle” and “contract carrier by motor vehicle,” as the special nature of the services performed by such carriers shall require, and the commission may from time to time establish such just and reasonable rules, regulations and requirements, consistent with the provisions of this chapter, to be observed by the carriers so classified or grouped, as the commission deems necessary or desirable in the public interest.

The commission may from time to time enter into joint and cooperative agreements with other governmental agencies in regard to safety, forms, operating procedures and regulatory jurisdiction.

The rules, regulations, requirements and classifications adopted in pursuance to the power and duty of the commission by this section granted and imposed shall conform as nearly as practicable to the rules, regulations, requirements and classifications promulgated by the Interstate Commerce Commission, the United States Department of Transportation, or any other appropriate governmental agency.

The commission shall not have the duty nor the power to regulate the rates of common carriers by motor vehicle which undertake, whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, to transport household goods.

The commission shall not have the duty nor the power to regulate the rates of contract carriers by motor vehicle, who or which, under special and individual contract or agreements, and whether directly or by a lease or any other arrangement, transport household goods.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7637; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1968, ch. 466; Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 501, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 77-7-15.
Promulgation of order, rules, regulations and requirements by commission.

The commission shall prescribe, issue, amend and rescind such reasonable rules and regulations as may be reasonably necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter. No rule or regulation shall be effective until thirty (30) days after copies of the proposed rule or regulation have been mailed to intrastate motor carriers affected thereby and until a notice, setting forth the terms or substance thereof and the time and place of a hearing thereon, has been published in a newspaper or newspapers of general circulation in the state and filed with the Secretary of State pursuant to the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law. Such hearing may be held at any time after twenty (20) days following the date of publication of such notice, but such rules or regulations shall not become effective until a hearing thereon. The commission may make its initial set of rules and regulations effective at the end of such thirty-day period, subject to review thereof. All rules and regulations of the commission shall be filed with its secretary and shall be readily available for public inspection and examination during reasonable business hours. Any interested person shall have the right to petition the commission for issuance, amendment or repeal of a rule or regulation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7637; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1968, ch. 466; Laws, 1992, ch. 440, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 4, 1992).

§ 77-7-16.
Supervision and inspection of safe operation and use of certain motor vehicles.

Supervision and inspection of the safe operation and the safe use of equipment of motor vehicles operating in the state shall be a specified duty of the Mississippi Transportation Commission and the Motor Carrier Division of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol within the Mississippi Department of Public Safety. In accordance therewith, the Mississippi Transportation Commission shall promulgate as its own the rules, regulations, requirements and classifications of the United States Department of Transportation or any successor federal agency thereof charged with the regulation of motor vehicle safety and, along with the Motor Carrier Division of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, shall enforce such rules, regulations, requirements and classifications. The Department of Public Safety shall provide training to its law enforcement officers and to law enforcement officers of the Mississippi Department of Transportation charged with the duty of enforcing the Mississippi Motor Carrier Regulatory Law of 1938 to the extent that funds are made available and training is approved under the Motor Carrier Safety Assistance Program of the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration. The Mississippi Transportation Commission shall establish a system of reciprocity with other states to facilitate the inspection of motor vehicles provided for in this subsection.

The Mississippi Transportation Commission and the Motor Carrier Division of the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol within the Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall have the authority to inspect for safe operation and safe use of equipment the following motor vehicles:

Each holder of a certificate of convenience and necessity, a permit to operate as a contract carrier or interstate permit;

Any individual, corporation or partnership engaged in a commercial enterprise operating a single motor vehicle or those in combination with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle rating of more than ten thousand (10,000) pounds; and

Any individual, corporation or partnership operating a motor vehicle of any gross weight transporting hazardous material that requires placarding under the Federal Hazardous Material Regulations.

This section shall not apply to the following:

Motor vehicles employed to transport school children and teachers;

Motor vehicles owned and operated by the United States, District of Columbia or any state or any municipality or any other political subdivision of this state;

Motor vehicles engaged in the occasional transportation of personal property without compensation by individuals which is not in the furtherance of a commercial enterprise;

Motor vehicles engaged in the transportation of human corpses or sick or injured persons;

Motor vehicles engaged in emergency or related operations;

Motor vehicles engaged in the private transportation of passengers;

Motor vehicles, including pick-up trucks, that have a GVWR or GCWR of Twenty-six Thousand (26,000) pounds or less, operating intrastate only, provided that such vehicle does not:

Transport hazardous material requiring a placard; or

Transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver.

Motor vehicles owned and operated by any farmer who:

Is using the vehicle to transport agricultural products from a farm owned by the farmer, or to transport farm machinery or farm supplies to or from a farm owned by the farmer;

Is not using the vehicle to transport hazardous materials of a type or quantity that requires the vehicle to be placarded in accordance with the Federal Hazardous Material Regulations in CFR 49 part 177.823; and

Is using the vehicle within one hundred fifty (150) air miles of the farmer’s farm, and the vehicle is a private motor carrier of property.

Motor vehicles engaged in the transportation of logs and pulpwood between the point of harvest and the first point of processing the harvested product;

Motor vehicles engaged exclusively in hauling gravel, soil or other unmanufactured road building materials;

As to hours of service only, utility service vehicles owned or operated by public utilities subject to regulation by the commission, while in intrastate commerce within this state, with a manufacturer’s gross vehicle rating of less than twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds, unless the vehicle:

Transports hazardous materials requiring a placard; or

Is designed or used to transport sixteen (16) or more people, including the driver.

Anyone who violates or fails to comply with this section shall be subject to the penalties as provided for in Section 77-7-311, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 544, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 304, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 498, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 77-7-17.
Prohibited interests of commissioners and employees.

No member of the commission, and no employee of the commission appointed or employed in the administration of this chapter, shall in any manner have pecuniary interest in, own any securities of, or hold any position with any motor carrier.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7638; Laws, 1938, ch. 142; Laws, 1993, ch 561, § 3, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

§ 77-7-19.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1993, ch. 561, § 22, eff from and after October 1, 1993.

[Codes, 1942, § 7669; Laws, 1938, ch. 142]

§ 77-7-21.
Engagement in intrastate operation by restricted motor carriers.

No restricted motor carrier not exempted in this chapter shall engage in intrastate operation on any highway within the state unless such carrier is in compliance with the requirements of the laws and regulations of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995); Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-23.
Promulgation of regulations governing restricted motor carriers.

The commission shall promulgate rules, regulations and procedures for the regulation of minimum amounts of financial responsibility relating to insurance requirements and self-insurance authorization, safety of operations and appointment of agents of service of process for restricted motor carriers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1995, ch. 338, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved March 10, 1995); Laws, 2018, ch. 332, Laws, 2018, ch. 332, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018)., eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 77-7-25.
Exemption of certain commercial motor vehicles from federal regulations; exceptions.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter to the contrary, Parts 390 through 397, Title 49, Code of Federal Regulations, shall not apply to commercial motor vehicles operated in intrastate commerce to transport property which have a gross vehicle weight rating or gross combination weight rating of twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds or less. The exception provided by this section shall not apply to vehicles transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded, or to vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver, as defined in Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 304, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2007.